District of Columbia statutes.
1-1163.37

Document under oath.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this subchapter, neither the Elections Board, or any of its officers or employees, nor the Director of Campaign Finance, or any of his or her officers or employees, may require that a document be sworn under oath unless the Elections Board and Director of Campaign Finance maintain at the place of receipt of such documents and during regular business days and hours, a notary public to administer such oaths.

(b)

If no such notary public is available, persons wishing to file documents for which an oath is requested may, in lieu thereof, affirm by their signature that their statements are true under penalty of § 1-1163.35.

History

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 337, 59 DCR 1862